Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF231.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin VETERANS CAMPGROUND; APPROPRIATION.new text end new text begin $1,300,000 in fiscal year 2026 is appropriated from the general fund to the Public Facilities Authority for a grant to the Disabled Veterans Rest Camp Association to design, construct, equip, and install wastewater infrastructure at the Veterans Campground on Big Marine Lake in Washington County. This is a onetime appropriation and is available until the project is completed or abandoned, subject to Minnesota Statutes, section 16A.642. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end